Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB382.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1701-A.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1701-A.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Hiring program for disabled individuals." A program 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 implemented by an applicant that employs two or more employees to employ and advance in employment individuals with a disability as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 12102 (relating to definition of disability).* * *Section 2. Section 1703-A.1 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1703-A.1. Application and administration.* * *(c.1) Hiring program.--(1) Prior to awarding a tax credit or tax benefit under this article, the department or administrating agency, in consultation with the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation of the Department of Labor and Industry and the Department of Human Services, shall make a determination as to whether an applicant that employs two or more employees has implemented or is in the process of implementing a hiring program for disabled individuals. A hiring program for disabled individuals shall include the following:(i) A minimum 5% hiring goal for individuals with a disability.(ii) An invitation for current and new employees to identify with a disability.(iii) A reference to a framework for employing individuals with a disability.(iv) An annual review to identify progress and assessment of new objectives.(2) The department or administrating agency, in consultation with the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation of the Department of Labor and Industry and the Department of 20250HB0382PN0347 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Human Services, shall include considerations to accommodate different sizes of employers and recommendations that are fiscally obtainable for an employer to implement as part of the employer's hiring program for disabled individuals.(3) This subsection does not apply to educational tax credits under Article XX-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0382PN0347 - 3 - 123456789